Utah statutes.
23-17-5.   Damages for destroyed crops -- Limitations -- Appraisal.

Whenever pheasants have damaged or destroyed cultivated crops on cleared and planted land, the Division of Wildlife Resources may pay to the crop owner for the actual damage not to exceed $200 yearly, if the owner notifies the Division of Wildlife Resources of the damage within 48 hours after the damage is discovered. The appraisal of the damage shall be made by the crop owner and the Division of Wildlife Resources as soon after notification as possible. If the crop owner and the Division of Wildlife Resources are unable to agree on the fair and equitable damage, they shall call upon a third party, consisting of one or more persons acquainted with the crops concerned and pheasants, to appraise such damage; but if these provisions relating to damage claims are in conflict with the requirements of the federal Pittman-Robertson Act or the rules and regulations issued under it, then the provisions relating to damage claims shall be null and void.

